North Carolina, session 2025, SB534.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund,
established in G.S. 143C-3-4.1(a), to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina
the sum of two hundred thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($237,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the constituent institutions
listed in this section for the amounts provided and the projects identified as follows:
(1) One hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000) to North Carolina
Agricultural & Technical State University to be used for the Agricultural
Research Classroom.
(2) One hundred twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($112,500,000) to
Winston-Salem State University to be used for the Health, Physical Education,
and Recreation Complex.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S534-v-1*